North Carolina statutes. Chapter 47. Probate and Registration.
Article 4. Curative Statutes; Acknowledgments; Probates; Registration.

§ 47-47.
Defective order of registration; “same” for “this instrument”.

Where instruments were admitted to registration prior to March 2, 1905, and the clerk’s order for the registration used the word “same” in place of “this instrument,” the said registrations are good and valid.

History.

1905, c. 344; Rev., s. 1010; C.S., s. 3329.

Legal Periodicals.

For article, “Toward Greater Marketability of Land Titles — Remedying the Defective Acknowledgment Syndrome,” see 46 N.C.L. Rev. 56 (1967).

§ 47-48.
Clerks’ and registers of deeds’ certificate failing to pass on all prior certificates.

When it appears that the clerk of the superior court, register of deeds, or other officer having the power to probate or certify deeds, in passing upon deeds or other instruments, and related certificates, consisting of more than one certificate of the same or a different date by other officer or officers taking acknowledgment or probating the certificates, has in his or her certificate or order mentioned only one or more of the preceding or foregoing certificates or orders, but not all of them, but has admitted the same deed or other instrument to probate or recordation, it is conclusively presumed that all the certificates of the deed or instrument necessary for probate or recordation have been passed upon, and the certificate of the clerk, register of deeds, or other probating or certifying officer is deemed sufficient and the probate, certification, and recordation of the deed or instrument is valid for all intents and purposes. This section applies to all instruments recorded in any county of this State prior to April 1, 2021.

History.

1917, c. 237; C.S., s. 3330; 1945, c. 808, s. 1; 1965, c. 1001; 1971, c. 11; 1973, c. 1402; 1987, c. 360, s. 2; 2013-204, s. 1.18; 2021-91, s. 4(d).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2013-204, s. 1.18, effective June 26, 2013, substituted “April 1, 2013” for “April 1, 1980” at the end of the last sentence.

Session Laws 2021-91, s. 4(d), effective October 1, 2021, rewrote the section.

§ 47-49.
Defective certification or adjudication of clerk, etc., admitting to registration.

In all cases where, prior to January 1, 1919, instruments by law required or authorized to be registered, with certificates showing the acknowledgment or proof of execution thereof as required by the laws of the State of North Carolina, have been ordered registered by the clerk of the superior court or other officer qualified to pass upon probates and admit instruments to registration, and actually put upon the books in the office of the register of deeds as if properly proven and ordered to be registered, all such probates and registrations are hereby validated and made as good and sufficient as though such instruments had been in all respects properly proved and recorded, notwithstanding the failure of clerks or other officers qualified to pass upon the proofs or acknowledgments of instruments and to admit such instruments to registration to adjudge or certify that said instruments were duly proven, and notwithstanding the failure of such officers to adjudge or certify that the certificates of proof or acknowledgments of said instruments were correct or in due form.

History.

1919, c. 248; C.S., s. 3331.

Legal Periodicals.

For article, “North Carolina’s Real Estate Recording Laws: The Ghost of 1885,” see
28 N.C. Cent. L.J. 199 (2006).

§ 47-50.
Order of registration omitted.

In all cases prior to October 1, 2005, where it appears from the records of the office of the register of deeds of any county in this State that the execution of a deed of conveyance or other instrument by law required or authorized to be registered was duly signed and acknowledged as required by the laws of the State of North Carolina, and the clerk of the superior court of such county or other officer authorized to pass upon acknowledgments and to order registration of instruments has failed either to adjudge the correctness of the acknowledgment or to order the registration thereof, or both, such registrations are hereby validated and the instrument so appearing in the office of the register of deeds of such county shall be effective to the same extent as if the clerk or other authorized officer had properly adjudged the correctness of the acknowledgment and had ordered the registration of the instrument.

History.

1911, cc. 91, 166; 1913, c. 61; Ex. Sess. 1913, c. 73; 1915, c. 179, s. 1; C.S., s. 3332; 1941, cc. 187, 229; 1949, c. 493; 1957, c. 314; 1961, c. 79; 1981, c. 812; 1993, c. 80, s. 1; 2013-204, s. 1.19.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2013-204, s. 1.19, effective June 26, 2013, substituted “October 1, 2005” for “December 31, 1992” near the beginning of this section.

§ 47-50.1.
Register’s certificate omitted.

In all cases prior to October 1, 2005, where it appears from the records of the office of the register of deeds of any county in this State that the execution of a deed of conveyance or other instrument by law required or authorized to be registered was duly signed and acknowledged as required by the laws of this State, and the register of deeds has failed to certify the correctness of the acknowledgment as required by

G.S. 47-14(a)

, the registrations are hereby validated and the instrument so appearing in the office of the register of deeds of that county is effective to the same extent as if the register of deeds had properly certified the correctness of the acknowledgment.

History.

2004-199, s. 17; 2013-204, s. 1.20.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2013-204, s. 1.20, effective June 26, 2013, substituted “October 1, 2005” for “October 1, 2004” near the beginning of the section.

§ 47-51.
Official deeds omitting seals.

All deeds executed prior to April 1, 2021, by any sheriff, commissioner, receiver, executor, executrix, administrator, administratrix, or other officer authorized to execute a deed by virtue of office or appointment, in which the officer has omitted to affix a seal after the officer’s signature, are not invalid on account of the omission of the seal.

History.

1907, c. 807; 1917, c. 69, s. 1; C.S., s. 3333; Ex. Sess. 1924, c. 64; 1941, c. 13; 1955, c. 467, ss. 1, 2; 1959, c. 408; 1971, c. 14; 1973, c. 1207, s. 1; 1983, c. 398, s. 2; 1985, c. 70, s. 2; 1987, c. 277, s. 2; 1989, c. 390, s. 2; 1991, c. 489, s. 2; 2013-204, s. 1.21; 2021-91, s. 4(e).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2013-204, s. 1.21, effective June 26, 2013, substituted “April 1, 2013” for “January 1, 1991” near the beginning of this section.

Session Laws 2021-91, s. 4(e), effective October 1, 2021, rewrote the section.

§ 47-52.
Defective acknowledgment on old deeds validated.

The clerk of the superior court may order registered any deed, or other conveyance of land, in all cases where the instrument and probate bears date prior to January 1, 1907, where the acknowledgment, private examination, or other proof of execution, has been taken or had before a notary public residing in the county where the land is situate, where said officer failed to affix his official seal, and where the certificate of said officer appears otherwise to be genuine.

History.

1933, c. 439.

§ 47-53.
Probates omitting official seals, etc.

If the acknowledgment, private examination, or other proof of the execution of any deed, mortgage, or other instrument authorized or required to be registered has been taken by or before any commissioner of affidavits and deeds of this State, clerk or deputy clerk of a court of record, or notary public of this or any other state, territory, or district, and the deed, mortgage, or other instrument has been recorded in any county in this State, but the commissioner, clerk, deputy clerk, or notary public omitted to attach his or her official or notarial seal to it, or if omitted, to insert his or her name in the body of the certificate, or if omitted, to sign his or her name to the certificate, if the name of the officer appears in the body of the certificate or is signed to it, or it does not appear of record that the seal was attached to the original deed, mortgage, or other instrument, or the commissioner, clerk, deputy clerk, or notary public has certified the certificate as under his or her “official seal,” or “notarial seal,” or words of similar import, and no such seal appears of record or where the officer uses “notarial” in his or her certificate and signature shows that “C.S.C.,” or “clerk of superior court,” or similar exchange of capacity, and the word “seal” follows the signature, then all such acknowledgments, private examinations or other proofs of such deeds, mortgages, or other instruments, and their registration are in all respects valid and binding. This section applies to acknowledgments, private examinations, or proofs taken prior to April 1, 2021. This section does not apply to pending litigation.

History.

Rev., s. 1012; 1907, cc. 213, 665, 971; 1911, c. 4; 1915, c. 36; C.S., s. 3334; 1929, c. 8, s. 1; 1945, c. 808, s. 2; 1951, c. 1151, s. 1; 1965, c. 500; 1983, c. 398, s. 3; 1985, c. 70, s. 3; 1987, c. 277, s. 3; 1989, c. 390, s. 3; 1991, c. 489, s. 3; 2013-204, s. 1.22; 2021-91, s. 4(f).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2013-204, s. 1.22, effective June 26, 2013, substituted “April 1, 2013” for “January 1, 1991” in the next-to-last sentence.

Session Laws 2021-91, s. 4(f), effective October 1, 2021, rewrote the section.

§ 47-53.1.
Acknowledgment omitting seal of clerk or notary public.

If any person has taken an acknowledgment as either a notary public or a clerk of a superior court, deputy clerk of a superior court, or assistant clerk of a superior court and has failed to affix his or her seal and this acknowledgment has been otherwise duly probated and recorded, then this acknowledgment is sufficient and valid. This section applies only to those deeds and other instruments acknowledged prior to April 1, 2021.

History.

1951, c. 1151, s. 1A; 1953, c. 1307; 1963, c. 412; 1975, c. 878; 1983, c. 398, s. 4; 1985, c. 70, s. 4; 1987, c. 277, s. 4; 1989, c. 390, s. 4; 1991, c. 489, s. 4; 2004-199, s. 18; 2013-204, s. 1.23; 2021-91, s. 4(g).

Cross References.

As to absence of notarial seal, see also

G.S. 47-102

and 47-103.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2004-199, s. 18, effective August 17, 2004, rewrote the section.

Session Laws 2013-204, s. 1.23, effective June 26, 2013, substituted “April 1, 2013” for “January 1, 1991” in the second sentence.

Session Laws 2021-91, s. 4(g), effective October 1, 2021, substituted “If any” for “Where any,” deleted “hereby declared to be” preceding “sufficient and valid,” substituted “April 1, 2021” for “April 1, 2013” and made a stylistic change.

§ 47-54.
Registration by register’s deputies or clerks.

All registrations of instruments heretofore made in the office of register of deeds of the several counties by the register’s deputy or clerk, and signed in the name of the register of deeds by the deputy or clerk, or signed by the deputy in his own name and not in the name of the register of deeds, when such registrations are in all other respects regular, are hereby validated and declared to be of the same force and effect as if signed in the name of the register of deeds by such register.

History.

1911, c. 184, s. 1; C.S., s. 3335; 1953, c. 849; 1963, c. 203.

Local Modification.

Montgomery: 1955, c. 1223.

§ 47-54.1.
Registration by register’s assistants or deputies.

All registrations of instruments heretofore made in the office of register of deeds of the several counties by the register’s assistant or deputy, and signed in the name of the register of deeds by the assistant or deputy, and initialed by the assistant or deputy, instead of being signed by them as assistant or deputy, when such registrations are in all other respects regular, are hereby validated and declared to be of the same force and effect as if signed by the assistant or deputy in the respective capacity.

History.

1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 877, s. 1.

§ 47-55.
Before officer in wrong capacity or out of jurisdiction.

All deeds, conveyances, or other instruments permitted by law to be registered in this State, which have been probated or ordered to be registered previous to January 1, 1913, before any officer of this or any other state or country, authorized by law to take acknowledgments or to order registration, where the certificate of the probate or order of registration is sufficient in form, but appears to have been certified by the officer in some capacity other than that in which such officer was authorized to act, or appears to have been made out of the county or district authorized by law, but within the State, and where the instrument with such certificate has been recorded in the proper county, are hereby declared to have been duly proved, probated and recorded, and to be valid.

History.

Rev., ss. 1017, 1030; 1913, c. 125, s. 1; C.S., s. 3336.

§ 47-56.
Before justices of peace, where clerk’s certificate or order of registration defective.

In every case where it appears from the record of the office of any register of deeds in this State that a justice of the peace in this State or any other state of the United States, has taken and certified the proof of any instrument required by the law to be registered, or the privy examination of a married woman thereto, and the deed and certificate have been registered prior to the first day of January, 1963, in the county where the lands described in the instrument are located, without a certificate or with a defective certificate of the clerk of the official character of the justice, or as to the genuineness of his signature, or without the order of registration of the clerk, or his adjudication of due probate, or with a defective adjudication thereof, such proofs, certificates and registration are hereby validated.

History.

1907, c. 83, s. 1; C.S., s. 3337; 1951, c. 35; 1963, c. 1014.

Local Modification.

Clay: 1933, c. 530.

§ 47-57.
Probates on proof of handwriting of maker refusing to acknowledge.

All registrations of instruments, prior to February 5, 1897, permitted or required by law to be registered, which were ordered to registration upon proof of the handwriting of the grantor or maker who refused to acknowledge the execution, are hereby validated.

History.

1897, c. 28; Rev., s. 1026; C.S., s. 3338.

§ 47-58.
Before judges of Supreme Court or superior courts or clerks before 1889.

Wherever the judges of the Supreme Court or the superior court, or the clerks or deputy clerks of the superior court, or courts of pleas and quarter sessions, mistaking their powers, have essayed previously to the first day of January, 1889, to take the probate of any instrument required or allowed by law to be registered, and the privy examination of femes covert, whose names are signed to such deeds, and have ordered said deeds to registration, and the same have been registered, all such probates, privy examinations and registrations are validated.

History.

1871-2, c. 200, s. 1; Code, s. 1260; 1889, c. 252; 1891, c. 484; Rev., s. 1009; C.S., s. 3339.

§ 47-59.
Before clerks of inferior courts.

All probates and orders of registration made by and taken before any clerk of any inferior or criminal court prior to the twentieth day of February, 1885, and valid in form and substance, shall be valid and effectual, and all deeds, mortgages or other instruments requiring registration, registered upon such probate and order of registration, shall be valid. This section shall apply only to the counties of Ashe, Beaufort, Bertie, Buncombe, Cumberland, Duplin, Edgecombe, Granville, Greene, Halifax, Hertford, Iredell, Lenoir, Martin, Mecklenburg, New Hanover, Northampton, Robeson and Wayne. This section applies to probates and private examinations taken before the clerks of the criminal court of Buncombe prior to February second, 1893.

History.

1885, cc. 105, 108; 1889, cc. 143, 463; Rev., ss. 1020, 1021; C.S., s. 3340.

§ 47-60.
Order of registration by judge, where clerk party.

All deeds, mortgages or other instruments which prior to the twentieth day of January, 1893, have been probated by a justice of the peace and ordered to registration by a judge of the superior court or justice of the Supreme Court, to which clerks of the superior court are parties, are hereby confirmed, and the probates and orders for registration declared to be valid.

History.

1893, c. 3, s. 2; Rev., s. 1011; C.S., s. 3342.

§ 47-61.
Order of registration by interested clerk.

The probate and registration of all deeds, mortgages and other instruments requiring registration prior to the fifteenth day of January, 1935, to which the clerks of the superior courts are parties, or in which they have an interest, and which have been registered on the order of such clerks or their deputies, or by assistant clerks of the superior courts, on proof of acknowledgment taken before such clerks, assistant clerks, deputy clerks, justices of the peace or notaries public, be, and the same are declared valid.

History.

1891, c. 102; 1899, c. 258; 1905, c. 427; Rev., s. 1015; 1907, c. 1003, s. 2; Ex. Sess. 1908, c. 105, s. 1; C.S., s. 3343; 1935, c. 235.

§ 47-62.
Probates before interested notaries.

The proof and acknowledgment of instruments required by law to be registered in the office of the register of deeds of a county, and all privy examinations of a feme covert to such instruments made before any notary public on or since March 11, 1907, are hereby declared valid and sufficient, notwithstanding the notary may have been interested as attorney, counsel or otherwise in such instruments.

History.

Ex. Sess. 1908, c. 105, s. 2; C.S., s. 3344.

Cross References.

As to acknowledgments taken by notaries interested as trustee or holding other office, see

G.S. 47-95

.

§ 47-63.
Probates before officer of interested corporation.

In all cases when acknowledgment or proof of any conveyance has been taken before a clerk of superior court, magistrate or notary public, who was at the time a stockholder or officer in any corporation, bank or other institution which was a party to such instrument, the certificates of such clerk, magistrate, or notary public shall be held valid, and are so declared.

History.

Rev., s. 1015; 1907, c. 1003, s. 1; C.S., s. 3345; 1971, c. 1185, s. 16.

Cross References.

As to probate before stockholders and directors of banks, see

G.S. 47-92

.

§ 47-64.
Probates before officers, stockholders or directors of corporations.

No acknowledgment or proof of execution, including privy examination of married women, of any deed, mortgage or deed of trust to which instrument a corporation is a party shall be held invalid by reason of the fact that the officer taking such acknowledgment, proof or privy examination was an officer, stockholder, or director in said corporation; but such proofs and acknowledgments and the registration thereof, if in all other respects valid, are declared to be valid. Nor shall the registration of any such instrument ordered to be registered be held invalid by reason of the fact that the clerk or deputy clerk ordering the registration was an officer, stockholder or director in any corporation which is a party to any such instrument.

History.

Ex. Sess. 1913, c. 41; C.S., s. 3346; 1929, c. 24, s. 1; 1943, c. 135; 1945, c. 860; 2013-204, s. 1.24.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2013-204, s. 1.24, effective June 26, 2013, deleted “prior to January 1, 1945” following “corporations” in the section heading; and deleted “executed prior to the first day of January, 1945” following “corporation is a party” in the first sentence.

§ 47-65.
Clerk’s deeds, where clerk appointed himself to sell.

All deeds made by any clerk of the superior court of any county or his deputy, prior to the first day of January, 1905, in any proceeding before him in which he has appointed himself or his deputy to make the sale of real property or other property are hereby validated.

History.

1911, c. 146, s. 1; C.S., s. 3347.

§ 47-66.
Certificate of wife’s “previous” examination.

All probates of deeds, letters of attorney or other instruments requiring registration to which married women were parties, had and taken prior to the fourteenth day of February, 1893, in which probate it appears that such married women were “previously examined” instead of “privately examined,” are hereby validated and confirmed.

History.

1893, c. 130; Rev., s. 1016; C.S., s. 3348.

§ 47-67.
Probates of husband and wife in wrong order.

All probates prior to March 6, 1893, of instruments executed by a husband and wife in which the probate as to the husband has been taken before or subsequent to the privy examination of his wife are validated.

History.

1893, c. 293; Rev., s. 1017; C.S., s. 3349.

Cross References.

As to order of acknowledgment being immaterial, see

G.S. 39-8

.

§ 47-68.
Probates of husband and wife before different officers.

Where, prior to the second day of March, 1895, the probate of a deed or other instrument, executed by husband and wife, has been taken as to the husband and the wife by different officers having the power to take probates of deeds, whether both officers reside in this State or one in this State and the other in another state, or foreign country, the said probate, in the cases mentioned, shall be valid to all intents and purposes, and all deeds and other instruments required to be registered, and which have been ordered to registration by the proper officer in this State, and upon such probate or probates, and have been registered, shall be taken and considered as duly registered, and the word “probate,” as used in this section, shall include privy examination of the wife.

History.

1895, c. 120; Rev., s. 1018; 1907, c. 34, s. 1; C.S., s. 3350.

Cross References.

As to acknowledgment before different officers at different times and places, see

G.S. 39-8

.

§ 47-69.
Wife free trader; no examination or husband’s assent.

In all cases prior to the twenty-fourth day of September, 1913, where a married woman who was at the time a free trader by her husband’s consent has executed and delivered a deed conveying her land, without her privy examination having been taken, and without the written assent of her husband other than his written assent contained in the instrument making her a free trader, such deed shall be valid and effectual to convey her land as if she had been, at the time of the execution and delivery of such deed, a feme sole. This section does not validate such deed where it would affect the title to land or property of purchasers or their grantees or assignees from such married woman and free trader subsequent to the execution of such deed.

History.

Ex. Sess. 1913, c. 54, s. 1; C.S., s. 3351.

§ 47-70.
By president and attested by treasurer under corporate seal.

All deeds and conveyances for lands in this State, made by any corporation of this State, which have heretofore been proved or acknowledged before any notary public in any other state, or before any commissioner of deeds and affidavits for the State of North Carolina in any other state, and sealed with the common seal of the corporation and attested by the treasurer, are hereby ratified and declared to be good and valid deeds for all purposes. Where such deeds have been executed for the corporation by its president and attested, sealed and acknowledged or probated as aforesaid, and the acknowledgment or probate has been duly adjudged sufficient by any deputy clerk and ordered registered, the acknowledgment, probate and registration are ratified, and said deed is declared valid. Such deeds, or certified copies thereof, may be used as evidence of title to the lands therein conveyed in the trial of any suits in any of the courts of this State where the title of said lands shall come in controversy.

History.

1905, c. 307; Rev., s. 1028; C.S., s. 3352.

§ 47-71.
By president and attested by witness before January, 1900.

Any deed or conveyance for land in this State, made prior to January 1, 1900, by the president of any corporation duly chartered under the laws of this State, and attested by a witness, is hereby declared to be a good and valid deed by such corporation for all purposes, and shall be admitted to probate and registration and shall pass title to the property therein conveyed to the grantee as fully as if said deed were executed according to provisions and forms of law in force in this State at the date of the execution of said deed.

History.

1909, c. 859, s. 1; C.S., s. 3353.

§ 47-71.1.
Corporate seal omitted prior to January 1, 2000.

Any corporate deed, or conveyance of land in this State, made prior to January 1, 2000, which is defective only because the corporate seal is omitted therefrom is hereby declared to be a good and valid conveyance by such corporation for all purposes and shall be sufficient to pass title to the property therein conveyed as fully as if the said conveyance were executed according to the provisions and forms of law in force in this State at the date of the execution of such conveyance.

History.

1957, c. 500, s. 1; 1963, c. 1015; 1969, c. 815; 1971, c. 61; 1973, c. 479; 1977, c. 538; 1981, c. 191, s. 1; 1983, c. 398, s. 5; 1985, c. 70, s. 5; 1987, c. 277, s. 5; 1989, c. 390, s. 5; 1991, c. 489, s. 5; 2013-204, s. 1.25.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2013-204, s. 1.25, effective June 26, 2013, substituted “January 1, 2000” for “January 1, 1991” twice in this section.

§ 47-72.
Corporate name not affixed, but signed otherwise prior to April 1, 2021.

In all cases prior to April 1, 2021, where any deed conveying lands purported to be executed by a corporation, but the corporate name was in fact not affixed to the deed, but the deed was signed by the president and secretary of the corporation, or by the president and two members of the governing body of the corporation, and the deed has been registered in the county where the land conveyed by the deed is located, the defective execution is in all respects valid, and the deed is deemed in all respects the deed of the corporation.

History.

1919, c. 53, s. 1; C.S., s. 3354; 1927, c. 126; 1963, c. 1094; 1973, c. 118, s. 1; 2013-204, s. 1.26; 2021-91, s. 4(h).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2013-204, s. 1.26, effective June 26, 2013, substituted “April 1, 2013” for “January, 1973” in the section heading; and substituted “April 1, 2013” for “the first day of January, 1973” near the beginning of this section.

Session Laws 2021-91, s. 4(h), effective October 1, 2021, rewrote the section.

§ 47-73.
Probated and registered on oath of subscribing witness.

In all cases prior to the first day of January, 1919, where any deed conveying lands was executed by a corporation, and said deed was probated and ordered registered upon the oath and examination of a subscribing witness, by the clerk of the superior court of the county in which the land conveyed by said deed is located, and said deed has been duly registered by the register of deeds of said county, such probate and order of registration shall be, and the same is hereby, declared to be in all respects valid.

History.

1919, c. 53, s. 2; C.S., s. 3355.

§ 47-74.
Certificate alleging examination of grantor instead of witness.

Wherever any deed of conveyance registered prior to January 1, 1886, purports to have been attested by two witnesses and in the certificate of probate and acknowledgment it is stated that the execution of such deed was proven by the oath and examination of one of the grantors in said deed instead of either of the witnesses named, all such probates and certificates are hereby validated and confirmed, and any such deed shall be taken and considered as duly acknowledged and probated.

History.

1925, c. 84.

§ 47-75.
Proof of corporate articles before officer authorized to probate.

All proofs of articles of agreement for the creation of corporations which were, prior to the eighteenth day of February, 1901, made before any officer who was at that time authorized by the law to take proofs and acknowledgments of deeds and mortgages, are ratified.

History.

1901, c. 170; Rev., s. 1027; C.S., s. 3356.

§ 47-76.
Before officials of wrong state.

In all cases where the acknowledgment, examination and probate of any deed, mortgage, power of attorney or other instrument required or authorized to be registered has been taken before any judge, clerk of a court of record, notary public having a notarial seal, mayor of a city having a seal, or justice of the peace of a state other than the state in which the grantor, maker or subscribing witness resided at the time of the execution, acknowledgment, examination or probate thereof, and such acknowledgment, examination or probate is in other respects according to law, and such instrument has been duly ordered to registration and has been registered, then such acknowledgment, examination, probate and registration are hereby in all respects made valid and binding. This section applies to probates and acknowledgments of deputy clerks of other states when such probate and acknowledgment has been attested by the official seal of said office and adjudged sufficient and in due form of law by the clerk of the court in the state where the instrument is required to be registered.

History.

1905, c. 505; Rev., s. 1013; C.S., s. 3357.

§ 47-77.
Before notaries and clerks in other states.

All deeds and conveyances made for lands in this State which have, previous to February 15, 1883, been proved before a notary public or clerk of a court of record, or before a court of record, not including mayor’s court, of any other state, where such proof has been duly certified by such notary or clerk under his official seal, or the seal of the court, or in accordance with the act of Congress regulating the certifying of records of the courts of one state to another state, or under the seal of such courts, and such deed or conveyance, with the certificate, has been registered in the office of register of deeds in the book of records thereof for the county in which such lands were situate at the time of such registration, are declared to be validly registered, and the proof and registration is adjudged valid. All deeds and conveyances so proved, certified and registered, or certified copies of the same, may be used as evidence of title for the lands on the trial of any suit in any courts where title to the lands come into controversy.

History.

1883, c. 129, ss. 1, 2; Code, ss. 1262, 1263; 1885, c. 11; Rev., ss. 1022, 1023; 1915, c. 213; C.S., s. 3358.

§ 47-78.
Acknowledgment by resident taken out-of-state.

When prior to the ninth day of March, 1895, a deed or mortgage executed by a resident of this State has been proved or acknowledged by the maker thereof before a notary public of any other state of the United States, and has been ordered to be registered by the clerk of the superior court of the county in which the land conveyed is situated, and said deed or mortgage has been registered, such registration is valid.

History.

1895, c. 181; Rev., s. 1019; C.S., s. 3359.

§ 47-79.
Before deputy clerks of courts of other states.

Where any deed or conveyance of lands in this State, executed prior to January 1, 1923, has been acknowledged by the grantor or the privy examination of any married woman has been taken before the deputy clerk of a court of record of any other state, and the certificate of acknowledgment and privy examination is otherwise sufficient under the laws of this State, except that it appears to have been signed in the name of the clerk of said court, by the deputy clerk, and the seal of the court has been affixed thereto, and such certificate has been duly approved by the clerk of the superior court of this State in the county where the lands conveyed are situated and the instrument ordered to be recorded, such certificate and probate and the registration made thereon are validated, and the conveyance, if otherwise sufficient, is declared valid.

History.

1913, c. 57, ss. 1, 2; C.S., s. 3360; 1951, c. 1134, s. 1.

§ 47-80.
Sister state probates without Governor’s authentication.

In all cases where any deed concerning lands or any power of attorney for the conveyance of the same, or any other instrument required or allowed to be registered, has been, prior to the twenty-ninth day of January, 1901, acknowledged by the grantor therein, or proved and the private examination of any married woman, who was a party thereto, taken according to law, before any judge of a supreme, superior or circuit court of any other state or territory of the United States where the parties to such instrument resided, and the certificate of such judge as to such acknowledgment, probate or private examination, and also the certificate of the secretary of state of said state or territory instead of the Governor thereof (as required by the laws of this State then in force) that the judge, before whom the acknowledgment or probate and private examination were taken, was at the time of taking the same a judge as aforesaid, are attached to said deed, or other instrument, and the said deed or other instrument, having said certificates attached, has been exhibited before the former judge of probate, or the clerk of the superior court of the county in which the property is situated, and such acknowledgment, or probate and private examination have been adjudged by him to be sufficient and said deed or other instrument ordered to be registered and has been registered accordingly, such probate and registration shall be valid. Nothing herein contained affects the rights of third parties who are purchasers for value, without notice, from the grantor in such deed or other instrument.

History.

1901, c. 39; Rev., s. 1014; C.S., s. 3361.

§ 47-81.
Before commissioners of deeds.

Any deed or other instrument permitted by law to be registered, and which has prior to the third day of March, 1913, been proved or acknowledged before a commissioner of deeds, is validated; and its registration is authorized and validated.

History.

1913, c. 39, s. 2; C.S., s. 3362.

§ 47-81.1.
Before commissioner of oaths.

All deeds, mortgages or other instruments required to be registered, which prior to March 5, 1943, have been probated by a commissioner of oaths and ordered registered, are hereby validated and confirmed as properly probated and registered instruments.

History.

1943, c. 471, s. 2.

§ 47-81.2.
Before United States Army, etc., officers, and other service members.

In all cases where instruments and writings have been proved or acknowledged before any commissioned officer of the United States Army, Navy, Air Force, Marine Corps, or Coast Guard or any officer of the United States Merchant Marine having the rank of lieutenant, senior grade, or higher, such proofs or acknowledgments, where valid in other respects, are hereby ratified, confirmed and declared valid. All proofs or acknowledgments made by any military personnel authorized by the Congress of the United States are hereby ratified, confirmed, and declared valid and shall not require the affixation of a seal where valid in other respects.

History.

1943, c. 159, s. 2; 2011-183, s. 32; 2013-204, s. 1.27.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2011-183, s. 32, effective June 20, 2011, in the section catchline, substituted “United States Army” for “army”; and in text, substituted “United States Army or Marine Corps” for “army of the United States or United States marine corps,” “Navy or Coast Guard” for “navy or coast guard,” and “Merchant marine” for “merchant marine.”

Session Laws 2013-204, s. 1.27, effective June 26, 2013, added “and other service members” in the section heading; substituted “any commissioned officer of the United States Army, Navy, Air Force, Marine Corps, or Coast Guard” for “any officer of the United States Army or Marine Corps having the rank of captain or higher, before any officer of the United States Navy or Coast Guard having the rank of lieutenant, senior grade, or higher” in the first sentence; and added the second sentence.

§ 47-82.
Foreign probates omitting seals.

In all cases where the acknowledgment, privy examination or other proof of the execution of any instrument authorized or required to be registered has been taken by or before any ambassador, minister, consul, vice-consul, vice-consul general or commercial agent of the United States in any country beyond the limits of the United States, and such instrument has heretofore been recorded in any county in this State, but the official before whom it was taken has omitted to attach his seal of office, or it does not appear of record that such seal was attached to the instrument, or such official has certified the same as under his “official seal” or seal of his office, or words of similar import, and no such seal appears of record, then all such acknowledgments, privy examinations or other proof of such instruments, and the registration thereof, are hereby made in all respects valid, and such instruments, after the ratification hereof, shall be competent to be read in evidence.

History.

1913, c. 69, s. 1; C.S., s. 3363.

§ 47-83.
Before consuls general.

Any deed or other instrument permitted by law to be registered, and which has prior to the thirteenth day of October, 1913, been proved or acknowledged before a “consul general,” is validated; and its registration is authorized and validated.

History.

Ex. Sess., 1913, c. 72, s. 2; C.S., s. 3364.

§ 47-84.
Before vice-consuls and vice-consuls general.

The order for registration by the clerk of the superior court and the registration thereof of all deeds of conveyance and other instruments in any county of this State prior to January 1, 1905, upon the certificate of any vice-consul or vice-consul general of the United States residing in a foreign country, certifying in due form under his name and the official seal of the United States consul or United States consul general of the same place and country where such vice-consul or vice-consul general resided and acted, that he has taken the proof or acknowledgments of the parties to such instruments, together with the privy examinations of married women parties thereto, are hereby, together with such proof and acknowledgments, privy examinations and certificates, validated.

History.

1905, c. 451, s. 2; Rev., s. 1024; C.S., s. 3365.

§ 47-85.
Before masters in chancery.

All probates, acknowledgments, and private examinations of deeds and conveyances of land heretofore taken before masters in equity or masters in chancery in any other state are declared to be valid, and all registrations of such deeds or conveyances upon such probates, acknowledgments and private examinations, or any of them, are hereby declared to be sufficient. All such deeds and conveyances and registration thereof, and all certified copies of such registrations, shall be received in evidence or otherwise used in the same manner and with the same force and effect as other deeds and conveyances with probates, acknowledgments, or private examinations made in accordance with provisions of statutes of this State in force at the time and as registrations thereof and certified copies of such registrations. Nothing in this section contained shall have effect to deprive anyone of any legal rights acquired, before its passage, from the grantors in such deeds or conveyances subsequently to their execution, where the deeds or conveyances by which such rights were acquired have been duly acknowledged or probated and registered.

History.

1911, c. 10; C.S., s. 3366.